Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.092

[Art. 14] Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

(1) Under such regulations as may be prescribed by the adjutant general, a person subject to this code who is accused of an offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial.

(2) When delivery under this section is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, and the offender after having answered to the civil authorities for the offense shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for the completion of the sentence.

[ 2009 c 378 s 8; 1989 c 48 s 14; 1963 c 220 s 14.]